utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 861 Y 1
SFX 861 0 нуваш .
SFX 3921 Y 1
SFX 3921 0 лските .
SFX 3787 Y 1
SFX 3787 0 изми .
SFX 839 Y 1
SFX 839 0 нувај .
SFX 4753 Y 1
SFX 4753 0 тивните .
SFX 3201 Y 1
SFX 3201 0 телство .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 увајте .
SFX 3783 Y 1
SFX 3783 0 лачи .
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 0 уваните .
SFX 4377 Y 1
SFX 4377 0 олошките .
SFX 4130 Y 1
SFX 4130 0 лиевска .
SFX 4129 Y 1
SFX 4129 0 лиевски .
SFX 229 Y 1
SFX 229 0 увате .
SFX 4680 Y 1
SFX 4680 0 екувањено .
SFX 342 Y 1
SFX 342 0 ваат .
SFX 3772 Y 1
SFX 3772 0 стер .
SFX 1450 Y 1
SFX 1450 0 годишен .
SFX 4861 Y 1
SFX 4861 0 бенана .
SFX 4249 Y 1
SFX 4249 0 зноно .
SFX 2502 Y 1
SFX 2502 0 вела .
SFX 2501 Y 1
SFX 2501 0 веле .
SFX 4655 Y 1
SFX 4655 0 апа .
SFX 2737 Y 1
SFX 2737 0 вело .
SFX 2900 Y 1
SFX 2900 0 апи .
SFX 2474 Y 1
SFX 2474 0 онска .
SFX 1322 Y 1
SFX 1322 0 онски .
SFX 4517 Y 1
SFX 4517 0 онско .
SFX 2260 Y 1
SFX 2260 0 истичките .
SFX 2465 Y 1
SFX 2465 0 овното .
SFX 4746 Y 1
SFX 4746 0 дуванава .
SFX 2782 Y 1
SFX 2782 0 тираше .
SFX 3767 Y 1
SFX 3767 0 урен .
SFX 2943 Y 1
SFX 2943 0 женана .
SFX 3088 Y 1
SFX 3088 0 веново .
SFX 920 Y 1
SFX 920 0 нувањава .
SFX 1769 Y 1
SFX 1769 0 лизира .
SFX 3156 Y 1
SFX 3156 0 сира .
SFX 3072 Y 1
SFX 3072 0 ленана .
SFX 419 Y 1
SFX 419 0 лниот .
SFX 3951 Y 1
SFX 3951 0 јката .
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 0 ењено .
SFX 3517 Y 1
SFX 3517 0 рчево .
SFX 4575 Y 1
SFX 4575 0 рист .
SFX 4911 Y 1
SFX 4911 0 мните .
SFX 2522 Y 1
SFX 2522 0 диш .
SFX 495 Y 1
SFX 495 0 лна .
SFX 481 Y 1
SFX 481 0 лни .
SFX 524 Y 1
SFX 524 0 лно .
SFX 2289 Y 1
SFX 2289 0 штана .
SFX 3003 Y 1
SFX 3003 0 алче .
SFX 3989 Y 1
SFX 3989 0 егаат .
SFX 1736 Y 1
SFX 1736 0 пите .
SFX 1715 Y 1
SFX 1715 0 рново .
SFX 3518 Y 1
SFX 3518 0 ричен .
SFX 1995 Y 1
SFX 1995 0 вот .
SFX 2374 Y 1
SFX 2374 0 нираат .
SFX 760 Y 1
SFX 760 0 тува .
SFX 4034 Y 1
SFX 4034 0 коти .
SFX 783 Y 1
SFX 783 0 кото .
SFX 1648 Y 1
SFX 1648 0 шат .
SFX 4491 Y 1
SFX 4491 0 јците .
SFX 2280 Y 1
SFX 2280 0 рскиве .
SFX 4396 Y 1
SFX 4396 0 тиравме .
SFX 4876 Y 1
SFX 4876 0 џиева .
SFX 1219 Y 1
SFX 1219 0 овата .
SFX 4537 Y 1
SFX 4537 0 икана .
SFX 2763 Y 1
SFX 2763 0 чувањево .
SFX 4171 Y 1
SFX 4171 0 тењето .
SFX 2992 Y 1
SFX 2992 0 кања .
SFX 507 Y 1
SFX 507 0 кање .
SFX 634 Y 1
SFX 634 0 ваше .
SFX 3454 Y 1
SFX 3454 0 сенине .
SFX 4423 Y 1
SFX 4423 0 ализмот .
SFX 886 Y 1
SFX 886 0 ранана .
SFX 4036 Y 1
SFX 4036 0 инче .
SFX 4819 Y 1
SFX 4819 0 оревме .
SFX 4818 Y 1
SFX 4818 0 оревте .
SFX 412 Y 1
SFX 412 0 тиов .
SFX 409 Y 1
SFX 409 0 тион .
SFX 4176 Y 1
SFX 4176 0 ривање .
SFX 3425 Y 1
SFX 3425 0 адената .
SFX 1102 Y 1
SFX 1102 0 авиот .
SFX 4761 Y 1
SFX 4761 0 нестиот .
SFX 1513 Y 1
SFX 1513 0 снува .
SFX 2251 Y 1
SFX 2251 0 ека .
SFX 4736 Y 1
SFX 4736 0 дуваноно .
SFX 2087 Y 1
SFX 2087 0 жевме .
SFX 3403 Y 1
SFX 3403 0 изираше .
SFX 2450 Y 1
SFX 2450 0 нуваниве .
SFX 984 Y 1
SFX 984 0 рањата .
SFX 799 Y 1
SFX 799 0 нувајќи .
SFX 4275 Y 1
SFX 4275 0 сана .
SFX 4573 Y 1
SFX 4573 0 сани .
SFX 3230 Y 1
SFX 3230 0 ечената .
SFX 1806 Y 1
SFX 1806 0 адат .
SFX 2324 Y 1
SFX 2324 0 алев .
SFX 695 Y 1
SFX 695 0 ален .
SFX 453 Y 1
SFX 453 0 чињата .
SFX 2963 Y 1
SFX 2963 0 ицине .
SFX 2191 Y 1
SFX 2191 0 остиве .
SFX 3391 Y 1
SFX 3391 0 шувањето .
SFX 3074 Y 1
SFX 3074 0 кањено .
SFX 4207 Y 1
SFX 4207 0 еаната .
SFX 2783 Y 1
SFX 2783 0 тиката .
SFX 2704 Y 1
SFX 2704 0 сниов .
SFX 2703 Y 1
SFX 2703 0 снион .
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 0 скава .
SFX 283 Y 1
SFX 283 0 увањава .
SFX 2359 Y 1
SFX 2359 0 инската .
SFX 3473 Y 1
SFX 3473 0 каната .
SFX 3666 Y 1
SFX 3666 0 шуваме .
SFX 1221 Y 1
SFX 1221 0 лново .
SFX 2735 Y 1
SFX 2735 0 диве .
SFX 4105 Y 1
SFX 4105 0 годишното .
SFX 685 Y 1
SFX 685 0 нела .
SFX 1891 Y 1
SFX 1891 0 јанка .
SFX 684 Y 1
SFX 684 0 неле .
SFX 666 Y 1
SFX 666 0 нело .
SFX 4982 Y 1
SFX 4982 0 ижат .
SFX 2876 Y 1
SFX 2876 0 инеа .
SFX 2995 Y 1
SFX 2995 0 инев .
SFX 3167 Y 1
SFX 3167 0 инел .
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 0 чкине .
SFX 4118 Y 1
SFX 4118 0 удување .
SFX 1007 Y 1
SFX 1007 0 ирањана .
SFX 1517 Y 1
SFX 1517 0 етана .
SFX 775 Y 1
SFX 775 0 ива .
SFX 4451 Y 1
SFX 4451 0 лачува .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 иве .
SFX 1621 Y 1
SFX 1621 0 иви .
SFX 1992 Y 1
SFX 1992 0 иво .
SFX 3735 Y 1
SFX 3735 0 иките .
SFX 2424 Y 1
SFX 2424 0 вена .
SFX 2098 Y 1
SFX 2098 0 вени .
SFX 2322 Y 1
SFX 2322 0 вено .
SFX 3374 Y 1
SFX 3374 0 жив .
SFX 3831 Y 1
SFX 3831 0 жил .
SFX 3851 Y 1
SFX 3851 0 чуваното .
SFX 3738 Y 1
SFX 3738 0 ечела .
SFX 3737 Y 1
SFX 3737 0 ечеле .
SFX 3736 Y 1
SFX 3736 0 ечело .
SFX 646 Y 1
SFX 646 0 раните .
SFX 4910 Y 1
SFX 4910 0 мнува .
SFX 3091 Y 1
SFX 3091 0 венине .
SFX 4345 Y 1
SFX 4345 0 рти .
SFX 4630 Y 1
SFX 4630 0 арци .
SFX 2925 Y 1
SFX 2925 0 анското .
SFX 3777 Y 1
SFX 3777 0 осна .
SFX 1467 Y 1
SFX 1467 0 сите .
SFX 1159 Y 1
SFX 1159 0 арство .
SFX 2476 Y 1
SFX 2476 0 лошка .
SFX 1633 Y 1
SFX 1633 0 лошки .
SFX 3729 Y 1
SFX 3729 0 лошко .
SFX 1973 Y 1
SFX 1973 0 етка .
SFX 1462 Y 1
SFX 1462 0 арова .
SFX 4615 Y 1
SFX 4615 0 етки .
SFX 1518 Y 1
SFX 1518 0 арови .
SFX 252 Y 1
SFX 252 0 сконо .
SFX 404 Y 1
SFX 404 0 уваниве .
SFX 1541 Y 1
SFX 1541 0 иштата .
SFX 4950 Y 1
SFX 4950 0 улка .
SFX 4822 Y 1
SFX 4822 0 нењето .
SFX 4705 Y 1
SFX 4705 0 суванана .
SFX 3928 Y 1
SFX 3928 0 ерство .
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 ла .
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 ле .
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 0 ли .
SFX 33 Y 1
SFX 33 0 ло .
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 0 атоно .
SFX 2806 Y 1
SFX 2806 0 дуваме .
SFX 1128 Y 1
SFX 1128 0 иите .
SFX 4110 Y 1
SFX 4110 0 сувањата .
SFX 3294 Y 1
SFX 3294 0 исаат .
SFX 4128 Y 1
SFX 4128 0 лувавме .
SFX 979 Y 1
SFX 979 0 иранине .
SFX 3905 Y 1
SFX 3905 0 тичари .
SFX 3679 Y 1
SFX 3679 0 овново .
SFX 550 Y 1
SFX 550 0 раа .
SFX 697 Y 1
SFX 697 0 рав .
SFX 2515 Y 1
SFX 2515 0 рак .
SFX 568 Y 1
SFX 568 0 рал .
SFX 519 Y 1
SFX 519 0 рам .
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 0 ран .
SFX 3013 Y 1
SFX 3013 0 пис .
SFX 2832 Y 1
SFX 2832 0 руваш .
SFX 4399 Y 1
SFX 4399 0 онската .
SFX 2831 Y 1
SFX 2831 0 рувај .
SFX 1792 Y 1
SFX 1792 0 тска .
SFX 935 Y 1
SFX 935 0 тски .
SFX 2143 Y 1
SFX 2143 0 тско .
SFX 2683 Y 1
SFX 2683 0 тското .
SFX 3041 Y 1
SFX 3041 0 оруваат .
SFX 1140 Y 1
SFX 1140 0 етите .
SFX 3459 Y 1
SFX 3459 0 ометри .
SFX 1565 Y 1
SFX 1565 0 годишниот .
SFX 4077 Y 1
SFX 4077 0 нос .
SFX 574 Y 1
SFX 574 0 нот .
SFX 3058 Y 1
SFX 3058 0 ствува .
SFX 4894 Y 1
SFX 4894 0 певме .
SFX 4140 Y 1
SFX 4140 0 есување .
SFX 2649 Y 1
SFX 2649 0 ема .
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 0 еме .
SFX 2250 Y 1
SFX 2250 0 еми .
SFX 4041 Y 1
SFX 4041 0 зеше .
SFX 2033 Y 1
SFX 2033 0 иеја .
SFX 4526 Y 1
SFX 4526 0 ловиќ .
SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 0 ица .
SFX 262 Y 1
SFX 262 0 ици .
SFX 2626 Y 1
SFX 2626 0 егне .
SFX 3347 Y 1
SFX 3347 0 егни .
SFX 4929 Y 1
SFX 4929 0 грами .
SFX 1708 Y 1
SFX 1708 0 дената .
SFX 2145 Y 1
SFX 2145 0 тари .
SFX 3179 Y 1
SFX 3179 0 мна .
SFX 428 Y 1
SFX 428 0 ниците .
SFX 2333 Y 1
SFX 2333 0 мни .
SFX 4175 Y 1
SFX 4175 0 ријата .
SFX 4502 Y 1
SFX 4502 0 торка .
SFX 2829 Y 1
SFX 2829 0 сница .
SFX 3515 Y 1
SFX 3515 0 сници .
SFX 336 Y 1
SFX 336 0 кова .
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 0 кови .
SFX 936 Y 1
SFX 936 0 ково .
SFX 2488 Y 1
SFX 2488 0 онов .
SFX 4422 Y 1
SFX 4422 0 анување .
SFX 3855 Y 1
SFX 3855 0 чуваниот .
SFX 4232 Y 1
SFX 4232 0 овава .
SFX 3184 Y 1
SFX 3184 0 гот .
SFX 2031 Y 1
SFX 2031 0 ијте .
SFX 3786 Y 1
SFX 3786 0 ирка .
SFX 4327 Y 1
SFX 4327 0 апат .
SFX 4698 Y 1
SFX 4698 0 суваните .
SFX 647 Y 1
SFX 647 0 ичките .
SFX 4868 Y 1
SFX 4868 0 акоски .
SFX 4723 Y 1
SFX 4723 0 жуваниот .
SFX 3427 Y 1
SFX 3427 0 аденава .
SFX 3708 Y 1
SFX 3708 0 адевте .
SFX 56 Y 1
SFX 56 0 њето .
SFX 1040 Y 1
SFX 1040 0 рањава .
SFX 2049 Y 1
SFX 2049 0 ида .
SFX 2519 Y 1
SFX 2519 0 иди .
SFX 3232 Y 1
SFX 3232 0 еченава .
SFX 4236 Y 1
SFX 4236 0 луваш .
SFX 4235 Y 1
SFX 4235 0 лувај .
SFX 2073 Y 1
SFX 2073 0 нетата .
SFX 748 Y 1
SFX 748 0 рство .
SFX 3781 Y 1
SFX 3781 0 оват .
SFX 1490 Y 1
SFX 1490 0 јува .
SFX 2871 Y 1
SFX 2871 0 овац .
SFX 3626 Y 1
SFX 3626 0 шувањево .
SFX 4209 Y 1
SFX 4209 0 еанава .
SFX 1281 Y 1
SFX 1281 0 чното .
SFX 1780 Y 1
SFX 1780 0 чевте .
