utilities/dictionaries/mk_MK-Macedonian.dic
дре/2,12,21,80,110,176,218,383,508,510,573,644,679,826,893,941,1024,1057,1089,1208,1282,1329,1405,1417,1487,1501,1786,1795,1939,1954,1955,1956,1957,1958,1959,1960,1961,2075,2098,2322,2333,2424,2568,2639,2808,2946,3016,3087,3088,3089,3090,3091,3092,3093,3094,3372,3602,3827,4259,4596,4645,4910
ски/3,4,21,25,26,28,85,110,113,213,541,543,699,835,905,924,939,947,1186,1290,1308,1470,1513,1638,1664,1672,1692,1712,1733,1734,1843,1844,1845,1893,2181,2330,2415,2430,2584,2712,2799,2991,3179,3328,3369,3655,3765,3773,3775,3783,3960,3972,4024,4026,4225,4278,4340,4571,4572,4802,4910,4916
ѓак/6,14,20,42,80,81,87,88,95,97,107,108,265,1322,1741,2028,2294,2474,3779,3965,4231
тами/1056,3921
зара/263,894,1687,1947,1975,2025,2050,2130,2146,2247,2333,2596,2714,2761,2906,3040,3297,3528,3789,3793,4249,4250,4251,4252,4253,4254,4255,4343,4468,4546,4611,4910,4945
прек/522,528,695,785,1072,1101,1524,1533,1635,1988,2459,2601,2619,2664,2746,2900,2950,2973,3004,3172,3312,3314,3333,3660,3840,3893,4016,4022,4081,4152,4261,4327,4344,4346,4568,4574,4656,4788,4936,4961,5000
поло/772,776,1215,1289,1311,1314,1444,1641,1902,1928,1972,2035,2086,2087,2095,2096,2291,2316,2421,2491,2492,2564,2803,2804,2823,2862,2898,2936,2937,2938,2939,2940,2941,2942,2943,2944,2988,3152,3374,3581,3691,3831,4043,4044,4182,4308,4379,4381,4495,4542,4986
дава/9,488,489,492,493,693,967,1295,1319,1466,2617,3290,3731,4129,4130
изба/98,1501,1531,1747,1860,1910,1911,1912,1996,2011,2029,2030,2048,2232,2501,2502,2737,3534,3535
патен/1396,1539,1595,2782,2827,3112,4169
салам/164,450,1286,2344,2605,3767,4221
образ/3,6,7,21,70,88,94,101,111,166,177,199,213,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,261,267,268,282,283,351,364,371,376,385,387,393,398,399,400,401,402,403,404,405,406,657,1084,1317,1351,1739,1740,1797,2003,2192,2465,3122,4294
полие/3772,4086,4646
навик/5,51,650,665,666,684,685,740,742,743,761,788,799,801,802,810,819,820,821,823,824,827,839,848,849,850,857,858,861,862,866,895,896,910,915,919,920,932,968,987,1023,1027,1041,1052,1059,1075,1076,1077,1078,1079,1080,1100,1138
потег/5,51,650,665,666,684,685,740,742,743,761,788,799,801,802,810,819,820,821,823,824,827,839,848,849,850,857,858,861,862,866,895,896,910,915,919,920,932,968,987,1023,1027,1041,1052,1059,1075,1076,1077,1078,1079,1080,1100,1138,2811,2812,2813,2814
водов/533,3518,3562,4019
собра/641,1260,2617,2905,3290,3522,3731,4129,4130,4180
гради/772,1174,1251,1339,1726,2188,2648,3044,3064,3201,3574,4524,4616
насмеј/1,94,101,111,199,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,261,267,268,282,283,351,364,371,376,385,387,393,398,399,400,401,402,403,404,405,406
партик/1328,4655
варвар/2,6,14,20,21,24,26,28,29,50,83,89,138,144,148,149,157,167,179,182,186,192,224,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,327,329,360,362,367,421,490,491,583,807,844,1014,1094,1511,2215,2216,2875,3787
домини/20,50,92,98,327,482,870,1082,1322
метеор/352,1133,1246,1427,1522,1600,3191,3460,4377
регула/623,998,1112,2077,2211,2356,3114,4753
завешта/10,13,22,331,342,413,641,693,1081,1260,3522
проголт/2,34,94,101,106,111,116,158,159,162,195,199,216,217,219,220,223,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,234,235,237,238,239,242,243,245,261,266,267,268,281,282,283,306,307,312,334,346,354,355,356,372,394,407,422,423,436,437,438,441,447,448,449
разглас/3,5,6,13,35,70,94,101,111,199,216,217,219,220,225,226,227,228,229,230,231,235,237,238,239,242,243,261,267,268,282,283,351,364,371,376,385,387,393,398,399,400,401,402,403,404,405,406,565,692
архитект/2,3,6,14,20,21,24,26,28,29,50,83,89,138,144,149,153,157,167,186,192,244,246,247,248,249,250,252,253,327,329,360,367,1286,1322,1358,2474,3767,4221,4398,4399,4517,4760
криминал/3,5,6,8,21,35,47,50,51,52,55,70,85,109,177,189,213,397,583,631,645,649,657,765,790,807,1294,1507,1537,1693,1694,1803,2125,2132,2260,2349,2358,2531,3080,3849
шеснаесет/1,50,113,166,170,179,299,301,637,843,914,1450,1565,2185,2286,2350,2370,3039,3192
комерција/305,419,481,495,524,713,714,909,923,1050,1609,1683,1769,1819,2117,2353,3253,3622
